District of Columbia statutes.
35-232

Subsidy agreement.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to enter into an agreement with the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority for the transportation, at reduced fares, of students going to and from public, parochial, and private schools and to and from related educational activities in the District of Columbia.

Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-152, § 2, 25 DCR 2534
This section is referenced in § 35-237.
1981 Ed., § 44-216.
1973 Ed., § 44-214.1.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 2-152, the School Transit Subsidy Act of 1978, see Mayor’s Order 90-130, October 2, 1990.
Delegation of Authority to the Director of the District Department of Transportation, see Mayor’s Order 2006-104, July 28, 2006 ( 53 DCR 6399).